Massachusetts, session 194th, HD5612.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 93A, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by adding the following definition:-
(e) “Online surveillance pricing”, offering different prices for purchase of services or for
purchase or rental of property, tangible or intangible, real, personal or mixed, based on a
person’s online activity, including but not limited to internet searches, browsing history, location
data, device type, clicks, time spent looking at various items, placement of items in a digital cart
or preparing them for online checkout. This shall not include: (i) price differences based on
reasonable cost differences in providing the product or service to different consumers; (ii) bona
fide discounts that are clearly disclosed and uniformly offered to all members of a broadly
defined group including but not limited to discounts for senior citizens, veterans, or students; (iii)
bona fide discounts offered to individuals who affirmatively and knowingly enroll in a loyalty
program; and (iv) pricing for insurance services or credit products.
of 2

SECTION 2. Section 2 of said chapter 93A is hereby amended by inserting in line 2,
after the word “commerce” following words:-
“, including online surveillance pricing, defined pursuant to section 1 of this chapter,”
of 2